Hawaii statutes.
§431:9-224 Separate licenses. The
commissioner may license an individual as an independent adjuster or as a
public adjuster, and separate licenses shall be required for each type of
adjuster. An individual may be concurrently licensed under separate licenses
as an independent adjuster and as a public adjuster. The full license fee
shall be paid for each license. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next